District of Columbia statutes.
6-1036

Funding; no compensation for members.

(a)

Upon certification of the availability of funds by the Chief Financial Officer, there shall be authorized for expenditure by the Commission, $200,000 from the Industrial Revenue Bond special account. The Commission may expend other funds as appropriated.

(b)

No member of the Commission shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties under this subchapter nor shall any member be compensated for time expended in the performance of duties under this subchapter.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1146, 49 DCR 6968

History